Louisiana, session 2026, HB678.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:5002.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5002.1. Medical school; dentistry school
A. A student who is determined by the administering agency to be eligible
for an Opportunity, Performance, or Honors Award upon high school graduation in
accordance with the requirements of this Chapter may apply unused award amounts
if enrolled in certain postsecondary education institutions as provided in this Section.
B. A student may apply unused award amounts pursuant to this Section if he
meets all of the following criteria:
(1) He has successfully completed an academic undergraduate degree at the
baccalaureate level at a postsecondary education institution outside the state other
than an institution provided for in R.S. 17:5027(C). This criterion applies both to
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-878 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 678
students who used part of their award while enrolled at an eligible college or
university before transferring to an out-of-state institution and students who never
enrolled in an eligible college or university before enrolling in an out-of-state
institution.
(2) He enrolls in a doctor of medicine, doctor of osteopathic medicine, or
doctor of dentistry degree program at a public postsecondary education institution
in the state, a regionally accredited independent college or university that is a
member of the Louisiana Association of Independent Colleges and Universities, or
a campus of the Edward Via College of Osteopathic Medicine in the state during or
after the 2025-2026 academic year.
(3) He signs a promissory note agreeing to pay the administering agency a
sum equal to the amount awarded pursuant to this Section, plus interest, upon
graduation or otherwise exiting the program; however, a student shall be exempt
from the payment requirement under the following circumstances:
(a) The student shall not be required to make the payment for the duration
of a residency program.
(b) The student shall not be required to make the payment if he practices
medicine or dentistry full-time in Louisiana for three consecutive years upon
successful completion of the residency program.
(c) The student shall not be required to make the payment in accordance with
rules promulgated by the administering agency pursuant to Paragraph (F)(2) of this
Section.
C. The administering agency shall determine how many, if any, of the
semesters or equivalent units of an award the student used during undergraduate
enrollment and shall apply the unused semesters or equivalent units to the award
provided pursuant to this Section, which shall not exceed eight semesters or
equivalent units.
D. The amount of the award paid pursuant to this Section shall not exceed
the amount determined by the administering agency to equal the tuition charged for
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-878 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 678
the medical or dental program or the amount of undergraduate full-time enrollment
charged by the highest cost public college or university in the state, whichever is
less.
E. The student shall be subject to all academic and other requirements
provided by this Chapter and by rule of the administering agency for continued
receipt of the award applicable to undergraduate students except that such
requirements may be modified by the administering agency as necessary to apply
such requirements to postgraduate study.
F. The administering agency shall promulgate rules necessary to implement
the provisions of this Section. Such rules shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(1) Provision for all available means of collecting amounts owed and interest
on unpaid amounts.
(2) Provision for circumstances pursuant to which a student shall be exempt
from the payment requirement provided in Paragraph (B)(3) of this Section,
including those specified in that Paragraph and any others determined by the
administering agency. Such rules shall provide for the definition, verification
requirements, and maximum duration of such circumstances.